District of Columbia statutes.
2-560

Certification.

Each part of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, each permanent supplement of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, and the District of Columbia Register shall contain a certificate by the Administrator stating that such part contains all documents required to be published pursuant to this subchapter as of the date of such certificate.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title III, § 310
as added Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 4, 25 DCR 6960
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1113, 59 DCR 8025
1981 Ed., § 1-1540.
1973 Ed., § 1-1539.1.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 deleted “the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large” following “Each part of.”